dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Bu Y 11
SFX Bu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bu 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Bu ec ce/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec ca/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec cev/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec cu/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec cah/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec cam/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec cem/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec cami/xPxE .
SFX Bu ec če/xPxE .

SFX Bv Y 69
SFX Bv ti l .
SFX Bv ti la .
SFX Bv ti lo .
SFX Bv ti li .
SFX Bv zditi ždų .
SFX Bv ti m .
SFX Bv ti š .
SFX Bv ti 0 .
SFX Bv ti mȯ .
SFX Bv i e .
SFX Bv iti ęt .
SFX Bv ti h .
SFX Bv ti še .
SFX Bv ti hmȯ .
SFX Bv ti ste .
SFX Bv ti hų .
SFX Bv iti ęći .
SFX Bv iti ęća .
SFX Bv iti ęće .
SFX Bv ti my .
SFX Bv ti mogo .
SFX Bv ti momu .
SFX Bv ti mym .
SFX Bv ti mom .
SFX Bv ti mo .
SFX Bv ti ma .
SFX Bv ti mų .
SFX Bv ti moj .
SFX Bv ti mojų .
SFX Bv ti mi .
SFX Bv ti me .
SFX Bv ti myh .
SFX Bv ti mym .
SFX Bv ti mymi .
SFX Bv ti mo .
SFX Bv ti vši .
SFX Bv ti všego .
SFX Bv ti všemu .
SFX Bv ti všim .
SFX Bv ti všem .
SFX Bv ti vših .
SFX Bv ti všimi .
SFX Bv ti vša .
SFX Bv ti všų .
SFX Bv ti všej .
SFX Bv ti všejų .
SFX Bv ti vše .
SFX Bv zditi ždeny .
SFX Bv zditi ždenogo .
SFX Bv zditi ždenomu .
SFX Bv zditi ždenym .
SFX Bv zditi ždenom .
SFX Bv zditi ždeni .
SFX Bv zditi ždene .
SFX Bv zditi ždenyh .
SFX Bv zditi ždenymi .
SFX Bv zditi ždena .
SFX Bv zditi ždenų .
SFX Bv zditi ždenoj .
SFX Bv zditi ždenojų .
SFX Bv zditi ždeno .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńje/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńja/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńju/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždenij/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bv zditi ždeńjah/xPxE .

SFX Bw Y 69
SFX Bw sti dl .
SFX Bw sti dla .
SFX Bw sti dlo .
SFX Bw sti dli .
SFX Bw sti dų .
SFX Bw sti dem .
SFX Bw sti deš .
SFX Bw sti de .
SFX Bw sti demȯ .
SFX Bw sti dete .
SFX Bw sti dųt .
SFX Bw sti deh .
SFX Bw sti deše .
SFX Bw sti dehmȯ .
SFX Bw sti deste .
SFX Bw sti dehų .
SFX Bw sti di .
SFX Bw sti dimȯ .
SFX Bw sti dite .
SFX Bw sti dųći .
SFX Bw sti dųćego .
SFX Bw sti dųćemu .
SFX Bw sti dųćim .
SFX Bw sti dųćem .
SFX Bw sti dųćih .
SFX Bw sti dųćimi .
SFX Bw sti dųća .
SFX Bw sti dųće .
SFX Bw sti domy .
SFX Bw sti domogo .
SFX Bw sti domomu .
SFX Bw sti domym .
SFX Bw sti domom .
SFX Bw sti domo .
SFX Bw sti doma .
SFX Bw sti domų .
SFX Bw sti domoj .
SFX Bw sti domojų .
SFX Bw sti domi .
SFX Bw sti dome .
SFX Bw sti domyh .
SFX Bw sti domym .
SFX Bw sti domymi .
SFX Bw sti domo .
SFX Bw sti dši .
SFX Bw sti dša .
SFX Bw sti dše .
SFX Bw sti deny .
SFX Bw sti denogo .
SFX Bw sti denomu .
SFX Bw sti denym .
SFX Bw sti denom .
SFX Bw sti deni .
SFX Bw sti dene .
SFX Bw sti denyh .
SFX Bw sti denymi .
SFX Bw sti dena .
SFX Bw sti denų .
SFX Bw sti denoj .
SFX Bw sti denojų .
SFX Bw sti deno .
SFX Bw sti deńje/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti deńja/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti deńju/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti deńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti denij/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti deńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti deńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bw sti deńjah/xPxE .

SFX Bx Y 9
SFX Bx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bx e e/xPxBxO .
SFX Bx e a/xPxE .
SFX Bx e 0 .
SFX Bx e u/xPxE .
SFX Bx e ah/xPxE .
SFX Bx e am/xPxE .
SFX Bx 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bx e ami/xPxE .

SFX By Y 38
SFX By ti l .
SFX By ti la .
SFX By ti lo .
SFX By ti li .
SFX By ti jų .
SFX By ti m .
SFX By ti ješ .
SFX By ti š .
SFX By ti je .
SFX By ti 0 .
SFX By ti jemȯ .
SFX By ti mo .
SFX By ti jete .
SFX By i e .
SFX By ti jųt .
SFX By ti h .
SFX By ti še .
SFX By ti hmȯ .
SFX By ti ste .
SFX By ti hų .
SFX By ti j .
SFX By ti jmȯ .
SFX By ti jte .
SFX By ti jųći .
SFX By ti jųća .
SFX By ti jųće .
SFX By ti jemy .
SFX By ti jema .
SFX By ti jemo .
SFX By ti my .
SFX By ti ma .
SFX By ti vši .
SFX By ti vša .
SFX By ti vše .
SFX By ti ny .
SFX By ti na .
SFX By ti no .
SFX By ti ńje .

SFX Bz Y 69
SFX Bz ti l .
SFX Bz ti la .
SFX Bz ti lo .
SFX Bz ti li .
SFX Bz titi ćų .
SFX Bz ti m .
SFX Bz ti š .
SFX Bz ti 0 .
SFX Bz ti mȯ .
SFX Bz i e .
SFX Bz iti ęt .
SFX Bz ti h .
SFX Bz ti še .
SFX Bz ti hmȯ .
SFX Bz ti ste .
SFX Bz ti hų .
SFX Bz iti ęći .
SFX Bz iti ęća .
SFX Bz iti ęće .
SFX Bz ti my .
SFX Bz ti mogo .
SFX Bz ti momu .
SFX Bz ti mym .
SFX Bz ti mom .
SFX Bz ti mo .
SFX Bz ti ma .
SFX Bz ti mų .
SFX Bz ti moj .
SFX Bz ti mojų .
SFX Bz ti mi .
SFX Bz ti me .
SFX Bz ti myh .
SFX Bz ti mym .
SFX Bz ti mymi .
SFX Bz ti mo .
SFX Bz ti vši .
SFX Bz ti všego .
SFX Bz ti všemu .
SFX Bz ti všim .
SFX Bz ti všem .
SFX Bz ti vših .
SFX Bz ti všimi .
SFX Bz ti vša .
SFX Bz ti všų .
SFX Bz ti všej .
SFX Bz ti všejų .
SFX Bz ti vše .
SFX Bz titi ćeny .
SFX Bz titi ćenogo .
SFX Bz titi ćenomu .
SFX Bz titi ćenym .
SFX Bz titi ćenom .
SFX Bz titi ćeni .
SFX Bz titi ćene .
SFX Bz titi ćenyh .
SFX Bz titi ćenymi .
SFX Bz titi ćena .
SFX Bz titi ćenų .
SFX Bz titi ćenoj .
SFX Bz titi ćenojų .
SFX Bz titi ćeno .
SFX Bz titi ćeńje/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćeńja/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćeńju/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćeńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćenij/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćeńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćeńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bz titi ćeńjah/xPxE .

SFX CA Y 69
SFX CA ti l .
SFX CA ti la .
SFX CA ti lo .
SFX CA ti li .
SFX CA ěti ų .
SFX CA ěti im .
SFX CA ěti iš .
SFX CA ěti i .
SFX CA ěti imȯ .
SFX CA ěti ite .
SFX CA ěti ęt .
SFX CA ti h .
SFX CA ti še .
SFX CA ti hmȯ .
SFX CA ti ste .
SFX CA ti hų .
SFX CA ěti ęći .
SFX CA ěti ęća .
SFX CA ěti ęće .
SFX CA ěti imy .
SFX CA ěti imogo .
SFX CA ěti imomu .
SFX CA ěti imym .
SFX CA ěti imom .
SFX CA ěti imo .
SFX CA ěti ima .
SFX CA ěti imų .
SFX CA ěti imoj .
SFX CA ěti imojų .
SFX CA ěti imi .
SFX CA ěti ime .
SFX CA ěti imyh .
SFX CA ěti imym .
SFX CA ěti imymi .
SFX CA ěti imo .
SFX CA ti vši .
SFX CA ti všego .
SFX CA ti všemu .
SFX CA ti všim .
SFX CA ti všem .
SFX CA ti vših .
SFX CA ti všimi .
SFX CA ti vša .
SFX CA ti všų .
SFX CA ti všej .
SFX CA ti všejų .
SFX CA ti vše .
SFX CA ti ny .
SFX CA ti nogo .
SFX CA ti nomu .
SFX CA ti nym .
SFX CA ti nom .
SFX CA ti ni .
SFX CA ti ne .
SFX CA ti nyh .
SFX CA ti nymi .
SFX CA ti na .
SFX CA ti nų .
SFX CA ti noj .
SFX CA ti nojų .
SFX CA ti no .
SFX CA ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX CA ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX CA ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX CA ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX CA ti nij/xPxE .
SFX CA ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX CA ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX CA ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX CB Y 69
SFX CB ti l .
SFX CB ti la .
SFX CB ti lo .
SFX CB ti li .
SFX CB ti ų .
SFX CB ti em .
SFX CB ti eš .
SFX CB ti e .
SFX CB ti emȯ .
SFX CB ti ete .
SFX CB ti ųt .
SFX CB ti eh .
SFX CB ti eše .
SFX CB ti ehmȯ .
SFX CB ti este .
SFX CB ti ehų .
SFX CB ti i .
SFX CB ti imȯ .
SFX CB ti ite .
SFX CB ti ųći .
SFX CB ti ųćego .
SFX CB ti ųćemu .
SFX CB ti ųćim .
SFX CB ti ųćem .
SFX CB ti ųćih .
SFX CB ti ųćimi .
SFX CB ti ųća .
SFX CB ti ųće .
SFX CB ti omy .
SFX CB ti omogo .
SFX CB ti omomu .
SFX CB ti omym .
SFX CB ti omom .
SFX CB ti omo .
SFX CB ti oma .
SFX CB ti omų .
SFX CB ti omoj .
SFX CB ti omojų .
SFX CB ti omi .
SFX CB ti ome .
SFX CB ti omyh .
SFX CB ti omym .
SFX CB ti omymi .
SFX CB ti omo .
SFX CB ti ši .
SFX CB ti ša .
SFX CB ti še .
SFX CB ti eny .
SFX CB ti enogo .
SFX CB ti enomu .
SFX CB ti enym .
SFX CB ti enom .
SFX CB ti eni .
SFX CB ti ene .
SFX CB ti enyh .
SFX CB ti enymi .
SFX CB ti ena .
SFX CB ti enų .
SFX CB ti enoj .
SFX CB ti enojų .
SFX CB ti eno .
SFX CB ti eńje/xPxE .
SFX CB ti eńja/xPxE .
SFX CB ti eńju/xPxE .
SFX CB ti eńjem/xPxE .
SFX CB ti enij/xPxE .
SFX CB ti eńjam/xPxE .
SFX CB ti eńjami/xPxE .
SFX CB ti eńjah/xPxE .

SFX CC Y 39
SFX CC ti l .
SFX CC ti la .
SFX CC ti lo .
SFX CC ti li .
SFX CC ti h .
SFX CC ti s .
SFX CC ti 0 .
SFX CC ti hmȯ .
SFX CC ti ste .
SFX CC yti ěh .
SFX CC yti ěše .
SFX CC yti ěhmȯ .
SFX CC yti ěste .
SFX CC yti ěhų .
SFX CC yti ųdų .
SFX CC yti ųdeš .
SFX CC yti ųde .
SFX CC yti ųdemȯ .
SFX CC yti ųdete .
SFX CC yti ųdųt .
SFX CC yti ųď .
SFX CC yti ųďmȯ .
SFX CC yti ųďte .
SFX CC ti vši .
SFX CC ti všego .
SFX CC ti všemu .
SFX CC ti všim .
SFX CC ti všem .
SFX CC ti vših .
SFX CC ti všimi .
SFX CC ti vša .
SFX CC ti všų .
SFX CC ti všej .
SFX CC ti všejų .
SFX CC ti vše .
SFX CC i y .
SFX CC i a .
SFX CC i o .
SFX CC ti ťje .
