dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
konec/Bu
jezditi/Bv
izvesti/Bw
sȯlnce/Bx
vladati/By
vlåděti/By
zahvatiti/Bz
pŕděti/CA
klåtiti/Bz
vlězti/CB
byti/CC
čudovišče/Bx
krasti/Bw
skråtiti/Bz
posvętiti/Bz
gryzti/CB
věnec/Bu
klasti/Bw
ukrasti/Bw
napasti/Bw
nenaviděti/CA
posětiti/Bz
shvatiti/Bz
upasti/Bw
odvråtiti/Bz
nesti/CB
sěděti/CA
svętiti/Bz
jajce/Bx
vezti/CB
vråtiti/Bz
sbože/Bx
ględěti/CA
råzpasti/Bw
platiti/Bz
viděti/CA
obogatiti/Bz
grnec/Bu
ležišče/Bx
byti/CC
igrišče/Bx
lězti/CB
zaplatiti/Bz
sŕdce/Bx
povråtiti/Bz
obråtiti/Bz
prinesti/CB
tratiti/Bz
iztratiti/Bz
privezti/CB
zabezpamętiti/Bz
vvesti/Bw
obględěti/CA
donesti/CB
prěvesti/Bw
stųpenišče/Bx
potręsti/CB
tręsti/CB
prěględěti/CA
byti/CC
tajnišče/Bx
propasti/Bw
pohytiti/Bz
sědališče/Bx
odplatiti/Bz
odnesti/CB
odvesti/Bw
pasti/Bw
podględěti/CA
prěnesti/CB
prěvezti/CB
prědviděti/CA
prědplatiti/Bz
snesti/CB
vnesti/CB
iznesti/CB
råznesti/CB
vvezti/CB
provesti/Bw
råzvesti/CB
odvezti/CB
izvezti/CB
oględěti/CA
uviděti/CA
ugryzti/CB
odgryzti/CB
spasti/Bw
odpasti/Bw
prosvětiti/Bz
nadględěti/CA
uględěti/CA
råzględěti/CA
vråtiti/Bz
doględěti/CA
domče/Bx
dovezti/CB
izplatiti/Bz
koljce/Bx
kurec/Bu
byti/CC
pȯlnomoćje/Bx
prězvišče/Bx
priględěti/CA
pristanišče/Bx
proizvesti/Bw
råzględěti/CA
snabděti/CA
srědišče/Bx
utratiti/Bz
ščititi/Bz
zatręsti/CB
tręsti/CB
vesti/Bw
vględěti/CA
zaščititi/Bz
osamotiti/Bz
ranec/Bu
sebesmŕtiti/Bz
osvatiti/Bz
svatiti/Bz
letišče/Bx
učilišče/Bx
råztratiti/Bz
byti/CC
čtiti/Bz
ględišče/Bx
gonišče/Bx
grobišče/Bx
izgnanec/Bu
izpȯlzti/CB
jalovec/Bu
križišče/Bx
lanec/Bu
mokrišče/Bx
mråvišče/Bx
nadglåvišče/Bx
obhvatiti/Bz
obrazec/Bu
ognišče/Bx
podnožišče/Bx
pȯlzti/CB
popȯlzti/CB
pręsti/Bw
pręsti/Bw
stanovišče/Bx
strělišče/Bx
topišče/Bx
usęsti/Bw
vȯzvesti/Bw
jezditi/Bv
zavråtiti/Bz
zemjedělišče/Bx
krųtiti/Bz
krųtiti/Bz
skladišče/Bx
trgovišče/Bx
vȯzbogatiti/Bz
valec/Bu
žilišče/Bx
bděti/CA
lože/Bx
ložišče/Bx
mųtiti/Bz
nesti/CB
råznesti/CB
smųtiti/Bz
smalec/Bu
usmŕtiti/Bz
vȯznesti/CB
pastvišče/Bx
pripasti/Bw
spasti/CB
vpasti/Bw
posęsti/Bw
ssęsti/Bw
utratiti/Bz
zasvětiti/Bz
råzvesti/Bw
věće/Bx
vȯzvråtiti/Bz
vråtiti/Bz
izvråtiti/Bz
obråtiti/Bz
obråtiti/Bz
prěobråtiti/Bz
osirotiti/Bz
sirotišče/Bx
byti/CC
odnesti/CB
tanec/Bu
byti/CC
ruměnec/Bu
provŕtiti/Bz
zapasti/Bw
uběžišče/Bx
bodec/Bu
bosti/Bw
bråzditi/Bv
čepec/Bu
gnězditi/Bv
gnojišče/Bx
gostinec/Bu
grådišče/Bx
klådec/Bu
krasti/Bw
krotiti/Bz
lenišče/Bx
lětovišče/Bx
legovišče/Bx
lovišče/Bx
mlåtiti/Bz
nanesti/CB
nasytiti/Bz
navesti/Bw
obgryzti/CB
objezditi/Bv
obnesti/CB
obvesti/Bw
oglušeti/By
okotiti/Bz
opasti/Bw
spręsti/Bw
osamotiti/Bz
osęsti/Bw
osvętiti/Bz
osvětiti/Bz
pozlåtiti/Bz
råzgryzti/CB
råzkrųtiti/Bz
råzmlåtiti/Bz
råzvezti/CB
zųbec/Bu
bosti/Bw
privesti/Bw
ukrotiti/Bz
ledovec/Bu
smlåtiti/Bz
parkovišče/Bx
stojišče/Bx
zlåtiti/Bz
nrěstilišče/Bx
sytiti/Bz
primětiti/Bz
obkrasti/Bw
råzkrųtiti/Bz
kotiti/Bz
trizųbec/Bu
dopȯlzti/CB
potiti/Bz
spotiti/Bz
koverec/Bu
iztręsti/CB
otręsti/CB
vȯztręsti/CB
byti/CC
palec/Bu
bljudce/Bx
svętilišče/Bx
dovesti/Bw
drobjenec/Bu
zaviděti/CA
krajec/Bu
vȯplȯtiti/Bz
prěsęsti/Bw
vezti/CB
skryvališče/Bx
posměšišče/Bx
klåtiti/Bz
priględěti/CA
izpasti/Bw
zrělišče/Bx
